Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 2 Sexual Offender Registration Review Board
42-1-13.
Sexual Offender Registration Review Board; composition; appointment; administration and duties; immunity from liability.

The Sexual Offender Registration Review Board shall be composed of three professionals licensed under Title 43 and knowledgeable in the field of the behavior and treatment of sexual offenders; at least one representative from a victims’ rights advocacy group or agency; and at least two representatives from law enforcement, each of whom is either employed by a law enforcement agency as a certified peace officer under Title 35 or retired from such employment. The members of the board shall be appointed by the commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities for terms of four years. On and after July 1, 2006, successors to the members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor. Members of the board shall take office on the first day of September immediately following the expired term of that office and shall serve for a term of four years and until the appointment of their respective successors. No member shall serve on the board more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies occurring on the board, other than those caused by expiration of a term of office, shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment to the position vacated for the remainder of the unexpired term and until a successor is appointed. Members shall be entitled to an expense allowance and travel cost reimbursement the same as members of certain other boards and commissions as provided in Code Section 45-7-21.

The board shall be attached to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities for administrative purposes and, provided there is adequate funding, shall:

Exercise its quasi-judicial, rule-making, or policy-making functions independently of the department and without approval or control of the department;

Prepare its budget, if any, and submit its budgetary requests, if any, through the department; and

Hire its own personnel, including, but not limited to, administrative personnel and clinical evaluators.

The board shall acquire, collect, and analyze information, including, but not limited to, criminal history record information, in determining a sexual offender’s risk assessment as provided for under Code Section 42-1-14.

The board may employ investigators under the board’s administration and supervision to complete the duties provided for under paragraph (1) of this subsection. The Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall maintain at least one position under the bureau’s administration and supervision which shall facilitate the provision of summarized criminal history record information to the board from the Georgia Crime Information Center and the National Crime Information Center.

Members of the board shall be immune from liability for good faith conduct under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 24/HB 1059; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 3-2, 3-3/HB 228; Ga. L. 2012, p. 985, § 2/HB 895; Ga. L. 2021, p. 417, § 3/HB 495.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “, including but not limited to administrative personnel and clinical evaluators” for “if authorized by the Constitution of this state or by statute or if the General Assembly provides or authorizes the expenditure of funds therefor” in paragraph (b)(3); added subsection (c); and redesignated former subsection (c) as present subsection (d).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in paragraph (b)(3), inserted a comma following “including” and “but not limited to”; and substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “Any investigator who, as of June 30, 2012, was employed by the board shall be transferred to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation on July 1, 2012, and shall no longer be under the administration or supervision of the board, except as required to provide the board with information as set forth in paragraph (15) of subsection (a) of Code Section 35-3-4. The executive director of the board shall arrange administratively for the transfer of any equipment relating to the transfer of such personnel.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, “paragraph (15) of subsection (a) of Code Section 35-3-4” was substituted for “paragraph (14) of subsection (a) of Code Section 35-3-4” in the first sentence of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 24/HB 1059, July 1, 2006, repealed the former Code section and enacted the current Code section. The former Code section, pertaining to registered sex offenders residing within areas in which minors congregate, was based on Code 1981, §

42-1-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 878, § 1. For present similar provisions, see Code Section

42-1-15

.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 30/HB 1059, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “(b) Any person required to register pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 42-1-12, relating to the state sexual offender registry, and any person required not to reside within areas where minors congregate, as prohibited by Code Section 42-1-13, shall not be relieved of the obligation to comply with the provisions of said Code sections by the repeal and reenactment of said Code sections.

“(c) The provisions of this Act shall not affect or abate the status as a crime of any such act or omission which occurred prior to the effective date of the Act repealing, repealing and reenacting, or amending such law, nor shall the prosecution of such crime be abated as a result of such repeal, repeal and reenactment, or amendment.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

The Georgia Sexually Violent Offender Registry, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Crime Information Center Council, Practice and Procedure, Chapter 140-2.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 11 (2006).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 39 (2012).

For note, “Banishing Acts: How Far May States Go to Keep Convicted Sex Offenders Away from Children?,” see 40 Ga. L. Rev. 961 (2006).

42-1-14.
Risk assessment classification; classification as “sexually dangerous predator”; electronic monitoring.

The board shall determine the likelihood that a sexual offender will engage in another crime against a victim who is a minor or a dangerous sexual offense. The board shall make such determination for any sexual offender convicted on or after July 1, 2006, of a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor or a dangerous sexual offense and for any sexual offender incarcerated on July 1, 2006, but convicted prior to July 1, 2006, of a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor. Any sexual offender who changes residence from another state or territory of the United States or any other place to this state and who is not already designated under Georgia law as a sexually dangerous predator, sexual predator, or sexually violent predator shall have his or her required registration information forwarded by the sheriff of his or her county of registration to the board for the purpose of risk assessment classification. The board shall also make such determination upon the request of a superior court judge for purposes of considering a petition to be released from registration restrictions or residency or employment restrictions as provided for in Code Section 42-1-19.

A sexual offender shall be placed into Level I risk assessment classification, Level II risk assessment classification, or sexually dangerous predator classification based upon the board’s assessment criteria and information obtained and reviewed by the board. The sexual offender may provide the board with information, including, but not limited to, psychological evaluations, sexual history polygraph information, treatment history, and personal, social, educational, and work history, and may agree to submit to a psychosexual evaluation or sexual history polygraph conducted by the board. If the sexual offender has undergone treatment or supervision through the Department of Corrections or the Department of Community Supervision, such treatment records shall also be submitted to the board for evaluation. The prosecuting attorney shall provide the board with any information available to assist the board in rendering an opinion, including, but not limited to, criminal history and records related to previous criminal history. The board shall utilize the Georgia Bureau of Investigation to assist it in obtaining information relative to its evaluation of sexual offenders and the Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall provide the board with information as requested by the board. The board shall be authorized to obtain information from supervision records of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles regarding such sexual offender, but such records shall remain confidential state secrets in accordance with Code Section 42-9-53 and shall not be made available to any other person or entity or be subject to subpoena unless declassified by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles. The clerk of court shall send a copy of the sexual offender’s conviction to the board and notify the board that a sexual offender’s evaluation will need to be performed. The board shall render its recommendation for risk assessment classification within:

Sixty days of receipt of a request for an evaluation if the sexual offender is being sentenced pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 17-10-6.2;

Six months prior to the sexual offender’s proposed release from confinement if the offender is incarcerated;

Sixty days of receipt of the required registration information from the sheriff when the sexual offender changes residence from another state or territory of the United States or any other place to this state and is not already classified;

Sixty days if the sexual offender is sentenced to a probated or suspended sentence; and

Ninety days if such classification is requested by the court pursuant to a petition filed under Code Section 42-1-19.

The board shall notify the sexual offender by first-class mail of its determination of risk assessment classification and shall send a copy of such classification to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Community Supervision, the sheriff of the county where the sexual offender is registered, and the sentencing court, if applicable.

If the board determines that a sexual offender should be classified as a Level II risk assessment classification or as a sexually dangerous predator, the sexual offender may petition the board to reevaluate his or her classification. To file a petition for reevaluation, the sexual offender shall be required to submit his or her written petition for reevaluation to the board within 30 days from the date of the letter notifying the sexual offender of his or her classification. The sexual offender shall have 60 days from the date of the notification letter to submit information as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section in support of the sexual offender’s petition for reevaluation. If the sexual offender fails to submit the petition or supporting documents within the time limits provided, the classification shall be final. The board shall notify the sexual offender by first-class mail of its decision on the petition for reevaluation of risk assessment classification and shall send a copy of such notification to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Community Supervision, the sheriff of the county where the sexual offender is registered, and the sentencing court, if applicable.

A sexual offender who is classified by the board as a Level II risk assessment classification or as a sexually dangerous predator may file a petition for judicial review of his or her classification within 30 days of the date of the notification letter or, if the sexual offender has requested reevaluation pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, within 30 days of the date of the letter denying the petition for reevaluation. The petition for judicial review shall name the board as defendant, and the petition shall be filed in the superior court of the county where the offices of the board are located. Within 30 days after service of the appeal on the board, the board shall submit a summary of its findings to the court and mail a copy, by first-class mail, to the sexual offender. The findings of the board shall be considered prima-facie evidence of the classification. The court shall also consider any relevant evidence submitted, and such evidence and documentation shall be mailed to the parties as well as submitted to the court. The court may hold a hearing to determine the issue of classification. The court may uphold the classification of the board, or, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the sexual offender is not placed in the appropriate classification level, the court shall place the sexual offender in the appropriate risk assessment classification. The court’s determination shall be forwarded by the clerk of the court to the board, the sexual offender, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, and the sheriff of the county where the sexual offender is registered.

Any individual who was classified as a sexually violent predator prior to July 1, 2006, shall be classified as a sexually dangerous predator on and after July 1, 2006.

Any sexually dangerous predator shall be required to wear an electronic monitoring system that shall have, at a minimum:

The capacity to locate and record the location of a sexually dangerous predator by a link to a global positioning satellite system;

The capacity to timely report or record a sexually dangerous predator’s presence near or within a crime scene or in a prohibited area or the sexually dangerous predator’s departure from specific geographic locations; and

An alarm that is automatically activated and broadcasts the sexually dangerous predator’s location if the global positioning satellite monitor is removed or tampered with by anyone other than a law enforcement official designated to maintain and remove or replace the equipment.

Such electronic monitoring system shall be worn by a sexually dangerous predator for the remainder of his or her natural life. The sexually dangerous predator shall pay the cost of such system to the Department of Community Supervision if the sexually dangerous predator is under probation or parole supervision and to the sheriff after the sexually dangerous predator completes his or her term of probation and parole or if the sexually dangerous predator has moved to this state from another state, territory, or country. The electronic monitoring system shall be placed upon the sexually dangerous predator prior to his or her release from confinement. If the sexual offender is not in custody, within 72 hours of the decision classifying the sexual offender as a sexually dangerous predator in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section, the sexually dangerous predator shall report to the sheriff of the county of his or her residence for purposes of having the electronic monitoring system placed on the sexually dangerous predator.

In addition to the requirements of registration for all sexual offenders, a sexually dangerous predator shall report to the sheriff of the county where such predator resides six months following his or her birth month and update or verify his or her required registration information.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 24/HB 1059; Ga. L. 2010, p. 168, § 12/HB 571; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 42/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 42/HB 142; Ga. L. 2012, p. 985, § 3/HB 895; Ga. L. 2013, p. 1056, § 1/HB 122; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-66/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 8-1/SB 367.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added the fifth sentence of paragraph (a)(2).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the sixth sentence in paragraph (a)(2).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in paragraph (a)(2), in the third sentence, inserted “or supervision” and inserted “or the Department of Community Supervision”, inserted “State” preceding “Board of Pardons and Paroles” near the beginning of the sixth sentence; in paragraph (a)(3), substituted “sexual offender” for “sex offender” near the beginning, and inserted “the Department of Community Supervision,” in the middle; in subsection (b), inserted “the Department of Community Supervision,” near the end of the last sentence; and, in the second sentence of the undesignated language at the end of subsection (e), substituted “Department of Community Service if the sexually dangerous predator is under probation or parole supervision” for “Department of Corrections if the sexually dangerous predator is on probation; to the State Board of Pardons and Paroles if the sexually dangerous predator is on parole;”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “Supervision” for “Service” in the second sentence of the undesignated paragraph of subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 30/HB 1059, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that:
“The provisions of this Act shall not affect or abate the status as a crime of any such act or omission which occurred prior to the effective date of the Act repealing, repealing and reenacting, or amending such law, nor shall the prosecution of such crime be abated as a result of such repeal, repeal and reenactment, or amendment.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 54(e), not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to subsection (a) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2010,
878, § 42, was not given effect.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 11 (2006).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 69 (2019).

42-1-15.
Restriction on registered offenders residing, working, or loitering within certain distance of child care facilities, churches, schools, or areas where minors congregate; penalty for violations; civil causes of action.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Individual” means a person who is required to register pursuant to Code Section 42-1-12.

“Lease” means a right of occupancy pursuant to a written and valid lease or rental agreement.

“Minor” means any person who is under 18 years of age.

“Volunteer” means to engage in an activity in which one could be, and ordinarily would be, employed for compensation, and which activity involves working with, assisting, or being engaged in activities with minors; provided, however, that such term shall not include participating in activities limited to persons who are 18 years of age or older or participating in worship services or engaging in religious activities or activities at a place of worship that do not include supervising, teaching, directing, or otherwise participating with minors who are not supervised by an adult who is not an individual required to register pursuant to Code Section 42-1-12.

On and after July 1, 2008, no individual shall reside within 1,000 feet of any child care facility, church, school, or area where minors congregate if the commission of the act for which such individual is required to register occurred on or after July 1, 2008. Such distance shall be determined by measuring from the outer boundary of the property on which the individual resides to the outer boundary of the property of the child care facility, church, school, or area where minors congregate at their closest points.

On and after July 1, 2008, no individual shall be employed by or volunteer at any child care facility, school, or church or by or at any business or entity that is located within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, a school, or a church if the commission of the act for which such individual is required to register occurred on or after July 1, 2008. Such distance shall be determined by measuring from the outer boundary of the property of the location at which such individual is employed or volunteers to the outer boundary of the child care facility, school, or church at their closest points.

On or after July 1, 2008, no individual who is a sexually dangerous predator shall be employed by or volunteer at any business or entity that is located within 1,000 feet of an area where minors congregate if the commission of the act for which such individual is required to register occurred on or after July 1, 2008. Such distance shall be determined by measuring from the outer boundary of the property of the location at which the sexually dangerous predator is employed or volunteers to the outer boundary of the area where minors congregate at their closest points.

Notwithstanding any ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to Code Section 16-6-24 or subsection (d) of Code Section 16-11-36, it shall be unlawful for any individual or for any person who is or should be registered on another state’s sexual offender registry to loiter, as prohibited by Code Section 16-11-36, at any child care facility, school, or area where minors congregate.

If an individual owns or leases real property and resides on such property and a child care facility, church, school, or area where minors congregate thereafter locates itself within 1,000 feet of such property, or if an individual has established employment at a location and a child care facility, church, or school thereafter locates itself within 1,000 feet of such employment, or if a sexual predator has established employment and an area where minors congregate thereafter locates itself within 1,000 feet of such employment, such individual shall not be guilty of a violation of subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, as applicable, if such individual successfully complies with subsection (f) of this Code section.

An individual owning or leasing real property and residing on such property or being employed within 1,000 feet of a prohibited location, as specified in subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, shall not be guilty of a violation of this Code section if such individual had established such property ownership, leasehold, or employment prior to July 1, 2008, and such individual successfully complies with subsection (f) of this Code section.

If an individual is notified that he or she is in violation of subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, and if such individual claims that he or she is exempt from such prohibition pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section, such individual shall provide sufficient proof demonstrating his or her exemption to the sheriff of the county where the individual is registered within ten days of being notified of any such violation.

For purposes of providing proof of residence, the individual may provide a driver’s license, government issued identification, or any other documentation evidencing where the individual’s habitation is fixed. For purposes of providing proof of property ownership, the individual shall provide a copy of his or her warranty deed, quitclaim deed, or voluntary deed, or other documentation evidencing property ownership.

For purposes of providing proof of a leasehold, the individual shall provide a copy of the applicable lease agreement. Leasehold exemptions shall only be for the duration of the executed lease.

For purposes of providing proof of employment, the individual may provide an Internal Revenue Service Form W-2, a pay check, or a notarized verification of employment from the individual’s employer, or other documentation evidencing employment. Such employment documentation shall evidence the location in which such individual actually carries out or performs the functions of his or her job.

Documentation provided pursuant to this subsection may be required to be date specific, depending upon the individual’s exemption claim.

Any individual who knowingly violates this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten nor more than 30 years.

Nothing in this Code section shall create, either directly or indirectly, any civil cause of action against or result in criminal prosecution of any person, firm, corporation, partnership, trust, or association other than an individual required to be registered under Code Section 42-1-12.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 680, § 4/SB 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 168, § 13/HB 571; Ga. L. 2017, p. 347, § 1/SB 250.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “or for any person who is or should be registered on another state’s sexual offender registry” in the middle of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to restriction on registered offenders residing, working, or loitering within certain distance of child care facilities, churches, schools, or areas where minors congregate; penalty for violations; civil causes of action. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 24/HB 1059.

Law reviews.

For comment, “ ‘An Era of Human Zoning’: Banning Sex Offenders from Communities Through Residence and Work Restrictions,” see 57 Emory L.J. 1347 (2008).

For survey article on criminal law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 85 (2008).

For summary review article on zoning and land use law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (2017).

42-1-16.
Definitions; employment restrictions for sexual offenders; penalties.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Area where minors congregate” shall include all public and private parks and recreation facilities, playgrounds, skating rinks, neighborhood centers, gymnasiums, school bus stops, and public and community swimming pools.

“Individual” means a person who is required to register pursuant to Code Section 42-1-12.

“Lease” means a right of occupancy pursuant to a written and valid lease or rental agreement.

“Minor” means any person who is under 18 years of age.

Any individual who committed an act between July 1, 2006, and June 30, 2008, for which such individual is required to register shall not reside within 1,000 feet of any child care facility, church, school, or area where minors congregate. Such distance shall be determined by measuring from the outer boundary of the property on which the individual resides to the outer boundary of the property of the child care facility, church, school, or area where minors congregate at their closest points.

Any individual who committed an act between July 1, 2006, and June 30, 2008, for which such individual is required to register shall not be employed by any child care facility, school, or church or by or at any business or entity that is located within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, a school, or a church. Such distance shall be determined by measuring from the outer boundary of the property of the location at which such individual is employed to the outer boundary of the child care facility, school, or church at their closest points.

Any individual who committed an act between July 1, 2006, and June 30, 2008, for which such individual is required to register who is a sexually dangerous predator shall not be employed by any business or entity that is located within 1,000 feet of an area where minors congregate. Such distance shall be determined by measuring from the outer boundary of the property of the location at which the sexually dangerous predator is employed to the outer boundary of the area where minors congregate at their closest points.

Notwithstanding any ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to Code Section 16-6-24 or subsection (d) of Code Section 16-11-36, it shall be unlawful for any individual to loiter, as prohibited by Code Section 16-11-36, at any child care facility, school, or area where minors congregate.

If an individual owns or leases real property and resides on such property and a child care facility, church, school, or area where minors congregate thereafter locates itself within 1,000 feet of such property, or if an individual has established employment at a location and a child care facility, church, or school thereafter locates itself within 1,000 feet of such employment, or if a sexual predator has established employment and an area where minors congregate thereafter locates itself within 1,000 feet of such employment, such individual shall not be guilty of a violation of subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, as applicable, if such individual successfully complies with subsection (f) of this Code section.

An individual owning or leasing real property and residing on such property or being employed within 1,000 feet of a prohibited location, as specified in subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, shall not be guilty of a violation of this Code section if such individual had established such property ownership, leasehold, or employment prior to July 1, 2006, and such individual successfully complies with subsection (f) of this Code section.

If an individual is notified that he or she is in violation of subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, and if such individual claims that he or she is exempt from such prohibition pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section, such individual shall provide sufficient proof demonstrating his or her exemption to the sheriff of the county where the individual is registered within ten days of being notified of any such violation.

For purposes of providing proof of residence, the individual may provide a driver’s license, government issued identification, or any other documentation evidencing where the individual’s habitation is fixed. For purposes of providing proof of property ownership, the individual shall provide a copy of his or her warranty deed, quitclaim deed, or voluntary deed, or other documentation evidencing property ownership.

For purposes of providing proof of a leasehold, the individual shall provide a copy of the applicable lease agreement. Leasehold exemptions shall only be for the duration of the executed lease.

For purposes of providing proof of employment, the individual may provide an Internal Revenue Service Form W-2, a pay check, or a notarized verification of employment from the individual’s employer, or other documentation evidencing employment. Such employment documentation shall evidence the location in which such individual actually carries out or performs the functions of his or her job.

Documentation provided pursuant to this subsection may be required to be date specific, depending upon the individual’s exemption claim.

Any individual who knowingly violates this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten nor more than 30 years.

Nothing in this Code section shall create, either directly or indirectly, any civil cause of action against or result in criminal prosecution of any person, firm, corporation, partnership, trust, or association other than an individual required to be registered under Code Section 42-1-12.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 168, § 14/HB 571.

42-1-17.
Definitions; residency restrictions for sexual offenders; penalties.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Area where minors congregate” shall include all public and private parks and recreation facilities, playgrounds, skating rinks, neighborhood centers, gymnasiums, and similar facilities providing programs or services directed towards persons under 18 years of age.

“Child care facility” means all public and private pre-kindergarten facilities, child care learning centers, and preschool facilities.

“Individual” means a person who is required to register pursuant to Code Section 42-1-12.

“Lease” means a right of occupancy pursuant to a written and valid lease or rental agreement.

“Minor” means any person who is under 18 years of age.

Any individual who committed an act between June 4, 2003, and June 30, 2006, for which such individual is required to register shall not reside within 1,000 feet of any child care facility, school, or area where minors congregate. Such distance shall be determined by measuring from the outer boundary of the property on which the individual resides to the outer boundary of the property of the child care facility, school, or area where minors congregate at their closest points.

If an individual owns or leases real property and resides on such property and a child care facility, school, or area where minors congregate thereafter locates itself within 1,000 feet of such property, such individual shall not be guilty of a violation of subsection (b) of this Code section if such individual successfully complies with subsection (d) of this Code section.

An individual owning or leasing real property and residing on such property within 1,000 feet of a prohibited location, as specified in subsection (b) of this Code section, shall not be guilty of a violation of this Code section if such individual had established such property ownership or leasehold prior to June 4, 2003, and such individual successfully complies with subsection (d) of this Code section.

If an individual is notified that he or she is in violation of subsection (b) of this Code section, and if such individual claims that he or she is exempt from such prohibition pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section, such individual shall provide sufficient proof demonstrating his or her exemption to the sheriff of the county where the individual is registered within ten days of being notified of any such violation.

For purposes of providing proof of residence, the individual may provide a driver’s license, government issued identification, or any other documentation evidencing where the individual’s habitation is fixed. For purposes of providing proof of property ownership, the individual shall provide a copy of his or her warranty deed, quitclaim deed, or voluntary deed, or other documentation evidencing property ownership.

For purposes of providing proof of a leasehold, the individual shall provide a copy of the applicable lease agreement. Leasehold exemptions shall only be for the duration of the executed lease.

Documentation provided pursuant to this subsection may be required to be date specific, depending upon the individual’s exemption claim.

Any individual who knowingly violates this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than three years.

Nothing in this Code section shall create, either directly or indirectly, any civil cause of action against or result in criminal prosecution of any person, firm, corporation, partnership, trust, or association other than an individual required to be registered under Code Section 42-1-12.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 168, § 14/HB 571; Ga. L. 2013, p. 135, § 12/HB 354.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “child care learning centers” for “day-care centers” near the end of paragraph (a)(2).

42-1-18.
“Photograph” defined; photographing minor without consent of parent or guardian prohibited; penalty.

As used in this Code section, the term “photograph” means to take any picture, film or digital photograph, motion picture film, videotape, or similar visual representation or image of a person.

No person required to register as a sexual offender pursuant to Code Section 42-1-12 shall intentionally photograph a minor without the consent of the minor’s parent or guardian.

Any person who knowingly violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 168, § 14/HB 571; Ga. L. 2011, p. 505, § 1/HB 162.